District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-1021

Business transactions of members or managers with the limited liability company.

Repealed.

History

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 22, 41 DCR 3010
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-1021.
1981 Ed., § 29-1321.